Utah statutes.
78A-5-109.   Costs of system.

(1)  The cost of salaries, travel, and training required for the discharge of the duties of district court judges, court commissioners, secretaries of judges or court executives, court executives, and court reporters shall be paid from appropriations made by the Legislature.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (1), the Judicial Council may directly provide for the actual and necessary expenses of operation of the district court, including personnel salary and benefits, travel, training, facilities, security, equipment, furniture, supplies, legal reference materials, and other operating expenses, or may contract with the county in a county seat or with the unit of local government in municipalities other than a county seat for the actual and necessary expenses of the district court.  Any necessary contract with the county or unit of local government shall be pursuant to Subsection 78A-5-111(4).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

